District of Columbia statutes.
47-2904

Recovery of fine; payment of moiety.

After the final conviction of any party for the violation of any of the provisions of §§ 47-2901 to 47-2903, and the recovery of the fine, a sum equal in amount to one-half of such fine shall be paid, and warrant drawn in the usual form out of the General Fund, to the party who may have been the informer in any such case. That all acts or parts of acts that are inconsistent with the provisions of §§ 47-2902 to 47-2904 are hereby repealed.

History

Mar. 7, 1870, ch. 42, p. 22, Corp. Laws of Wash., 67th Council, §§ 4, 5
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2904.
1973 Ed., § 47-2904.